Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7772.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-12 of the General Laws entitled "Minimum Wages" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-12-4.5. Overtime pay for healthcare professionals.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all healthcare workers and all medical direct
support professionals who are employed in a healthcare facility, as defined in § 27-18-1.1, on any
Sunday or holiday, shall be compensated at the rate of time and one-half.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005010
========